Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB1328.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Short title.This act shall be known and may be cited as the Utility Worksite Automated External Defibrillator Safety Act.Section 2. Legislative findings and purpose.(a) Findings.--The General Assembly finds and declares as follows:(1) Pennsylvania lineworkers perform some of the most important and dangerous work in this Commonwealth, as they routinely work on energized electrical systems, at significant heights, in confined spaces and in all weather conditions, often during storms and disasters.(2) Sudden cardiac arrest is a constant risk to these workers due to electrical shock, extreme exertion or trauma.123456789101112131415161718 (3) In sudden cardiac arrest, survival is measured in seconds, and the chance of survival decreases by about 10% for every minute that passes without defibrillation.(4) AEDs are simple, portable devices designed so that anyone can use them with minimal training, and they can mean the difference between life and death.(5) The risk of death from sudden cardiac arrest is elevated in rural communities, where the nearest hospital or emergency medical services station may be 20 to 40 minutes away.(6) Pennsylvania law already mandates AEDs in schools, hotels, health clubs and coal mines, yet there is currently no requirement that electric utilities or their contractors provide AEDs at worksites where linework and electrical work are performed.(7) This lack of a requirement leaves a critical gap in protection for workers whose jobs are both inherently hazardous and essential to public safety and the reliability of the electric grid.(8) AEDs are inexpensive, easy to use and require minimal training, and for large utilities, the cost of purchasing and maintaining AEDs and providing basic training is small when compared to the human and financial cost of a preventable death and the loss of a skilled, experienced lineworker.(9) Experienced lineworkers are essential to maintaining and restoring our electric grid.(10) Pennsylvania already protects students, health club members, hotel guests and miners with AED mandates, and the lineworkers who power our homes, businesses and hospitals 20260SB1328PN1720 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 deserve the same protection.(11) The United States Occupational Safety and Health Administration does not maintain a specific standard or policy governing the placement or maintenance of AEDs at worksites.(b) Purposes.--The purposes of this act are to:(1) Ensure the availability and operability of AEDs at each utility or electrical worksite, including a temporary, mobile or field worksite.(2) Require basic AED and CPR training for lineworkers and line crew leaders and establish reasonable maintenance and inspection standards.(3) Extend and clarify Good Samaritan protections so that individuals who use AEDs in good faith are shielded from unnecessary liability, consistent with existing protections in schools, health clubs, hotels and coal mines.Section 3. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this act shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Automated external defibrillator" or "AED." A portable medical device that:(1) Is approved by the United States Food and Drug Administration.(2) Is designed to be operated by a layperson.(3) Is capable of recognizing the presence or absence of ventricular fibrillation or rapid ventricular tachycardia and determining, without intervention by the user, whether defibrillation should be performed.(4) Upon determining that defibrillation should be 20260SB1328PN1720 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 performed, automatically charges and requests delivery of an electrical impulse to an individual's heart."Cardiopulmonary resuscitation" or "CPR." A first aid technique utilizing hands-only compressions of the chest used to revive an individual whose heart has stopped beating."Department." The Department of Labor and Industry of the Commonwealth."Lineworker." An employee or contractor who performs or supervises construction, maintenance, repair or operation of overhead or underground electric utility lines or related electrical equipment."Utility."(1) Any of the following employers of lineworkers:(i) A public utility as defined in 66 Pa.C.S. § 102 (relating to definitions).(ii) A municipal electric system operating within this Commonwealth.(iii) Any other entity engaged in the generation, transmission or distribution of electric power within this Commonwealth.(2) The term includes a contractors or subcontractor performing linework or electrical work on behalf of an entity enumerated under paragraph (1)."Utility or electrical worksite" or "worksite." A location, whether fixed or in the field, where linework or electrical work is performed for a utility in connection with the generation, transmission or distribution of electric power, including a substation, pole or line location, construction or maintenance site or other location designated by the utility where lineworkers are assigned to perform electric utility or 20260SB1328PN1720 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 electrical work.Section 4. AED availability on worksites.(a) Duty of utility.--A utility shall ensure that at least one AED is readily available and operable at each worksite.(b) Temporary, mobile or filed worksites.--For each worksite that is temporary, mobile or in the field, including a location where a lineworker is working on poles, underground facilities or storm restoration activities, the AED required under subsection (a) must be:(1) located on a vehicle, trailer or other mobile unit that remains on or in reasonable proximity to the worksite; and(2) reasonably accessible to lineworkers and line crew leaders during working hours.(c) Multiple locations.--If a utility deploys multiple line crews to distinct locations:(1) For the purposes of this section, each distinct location shall be treated as a separate worksite.(2) The utility shall ensure that an AED is readily available and operative at each location in accordance with this section.Section 5. Notice.A utility shall:(1) Post or otherwise communicate the location of each AED to line crew leaders, lineworkers and other employees at a worksite.(2) Include information on the location of each AED in any applicable job safety briefing conducted prior to the start of work or on any tailboard of a vehicle used at a worksite.20260SB1328PN1720 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Section 6. Training.(a) Basic training in CPR and AED use.--(1) Each line crew leader assigned to a worksite shall maintain current certification in CPR and AED use from a nationally recognized organization.(2) Each utility shall ensure that a sufficient number of lineworkers at each worksite are trained in CPR and AED use and reasonably present at the worksite during working hours.(b) Contents.--CPR and AED use training under this section must include:(1) Recognition of sudden cardiac arrest.(2) Prompt activation of emergency medical services.(3) Proper operation and use of an AED.(4) Basic CPR techniques.(c) Records.--Each utility shall maintain records of required training under this section and shall make the records available for inspection upon request by the department.Section 7. Maintenance and inspection.(a) Maintenance standards.--A utility shall:(1) Maintain each AED in accordance with the manufacturer's guidelines.(2) Ensure that AED batteries, pads and other required accessories are within the manufacturer's recommended service life and are replaced as necessary.(3) Ensure that each AED is stored in a manner that protects it from damage and environmental conditions likely to impair its operation.(b) Inspection.--Each utility shall establish and implement reasonable inspection procedures to verify that each AED:20260SB1328PN1720 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (1) Is present at each designated location.(2) Indicates readiness for use through self-test or status indicators.(3) Is not visibly damaged or otherwise compromised.(c) Documentation.--Each utility shall document required inspections and retain the documentation for a period of not less than two years.Section 8. Immunities.(a) Good Samaritan immunity.--A person who, in good faith and without compensation, uses or attempts to use an AED at a worksite to render emergency care or treatment to an individual in apparent sudden cardiac arrest shall be immune from civil liability for any damage or injury resulting from the use or attempted use, or from any act or omission in providing or arranging further medical treatment, except for acts or omissions that constitute gross negligence or willful or wanton misconduct.(b) Utility, owner and operator immunity.--A utility or an owner or operator of a worksite, including an officer, employee or agent of the utility or owner or operator of the worksite, that acquires, provides, installs, maintains or makes an AED available in compliance with this act shall be immune from civil liability for any damage or injury resulting from the use or attempted use of the AED by any person, except for acts or omissions that constitute gross negligence or willful or wanton misconduct.(c) Consistency with existing law.--The immunities provided under this section:(1) Are intended to be consistent with and in addition to protections applicable to the use of AEDs in schools, 20260SB1328PN1720 - 7 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 health clubs, hotels and coal mines under existing law.(2) Shall be construed broadly to effectuate the purpose of encouraging the availability and use of AEDs in emergencies.Section 9. Investigations.(a) Authorization.--If the department receives information indicating that a person has violated this act, the department may investigate the matter.(b) Permitted actions.--As part of an investigation under this section, an authorized representative of the department may take any of the following actions:(1) Enter and inspect a worksite at any reasonable time to examine and inspect records that relate to compliance with this act.(2) Subpoena witnesses, administer oaths, examine witnesses and copy or compel the production of records, contracts and other documents that are necessary and appropriate for the enforcement of this act.Section 10. Penalties.A person that violates this act shall be subject to the following:(1) For a first violation, the department shall issue a warning letter to the person detailing the violation and shall provide 30 days for the person to correct the violation.(2) For a second or subsequent violation, the department shall bring administrative action to assess a fine not exceeding $500.Section 11. Regulations.(a) Authorization.--The department may promulgate 20260SB1328PN1720 - 8 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 regulations as necessary to implement, administer and enforce this act.(b) Conflict with Federal law.--If the department determines that any provision of this act conflicts with or is preempted by Federal law, including regulations of the Unites States Occupational Safety and Health Administration, the department shall:(1) Issue a statement of policy explaining the conflict or preemption, the entities and individuals impacted and any other information that may be relevant to the public.(2) Transmit notice of the statement of policy under paragraph (1) to the Legislative Reference Bureau for publication in the next available issue of the Pennsylvania Bulletin.(3) Conduct outreach to stakeholders as soon as practicable and provide a reasonable time for stakeholders to provide feedback on the statement of policy under paragraph (1).Section 12. Construction.Nothing in this act shall be construed to:(1) Create a duty for any person to use an AED.(2) Require the placement of an AED in a location other than a utility or electrical worksite.(3) Limit or reduce protections or requirements for AEDs under other Federal or State law.Section 13. Effective date.This act shall take effect in 60 days.20260SB1328PN1720 - 9 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627